bg-BG: Включени компоненти на таблата: Чанта/калъф за носене; Допълнителна каишка/връзка; Комплект за поддръжка на кожата (прах/паста); Брошура с инструкции; Съвпадаща двойка (баян + даян); Достъп до онлайн уроци; Подплатени покривала; Пръстени (chutta); Единичен баян (бас барабан); Единичен даян (висок барабан); Блокчета за настройка (gatta); Чукче за настройка (gatta/чукче); Друго
es: Componentes incluidos con la tabla: Bolsa de transporte/estuche; Correa/cordón adicional; Kit de cuidado del parche (polvo/pasta); Folleto de instrucciones; Par a juego (bayan + dayan); Acceso a clases online; Fundas acolchadas; Anillos (chutta); Bayan individual (tambor bajo); Dayan individual (tambor agudo); Bloques de afinación (gatta); Martillo de afinación (gatta/martillo); Otro
fr: Composants inclus avec le tabla: Sac/étui de transport; Sangle/laçage supplémentaire; Kit d’entretien de la peau (poudre/pâte); Livret d’instructions; Paire assortie (bayan + dayan); Accès aux leçons en ligne; Housses rembourrées; Anneaux (chutta); Bayan seul (tambour basse); Dayan seul (tambour aigu); Blocs d’accordage (gatta); Marteau d’accordage (gatta/marteau); Autre
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos na tabla: Saco/estojo de transporte; Alça/tira de amarração adicional; Kit de cuidado da pele (pó/pasta); Livro de instruções; Par combinado (bayan e dayan); Acesso a aulas online; Capas almofadadas; Anéis (chutta); Bayan individual (tambor baixo); Dayan individual (tambor agudo); Blocos de afinação (gatta); Martelo de afinação (gatta/martelo); Outro
nb: Inkluderte komponenter med tabla: Bæreveske/koffert; Ekstra reim/snøring; Pleiesett for trommeskinn (pulver/pasta); Instruksjonshefte; Matchet par (bayan + dayan); Tilgang til online-leksjoner; Polstrede trekk; Ringer (chutta); Enkel bayan (basstromme); Enkel dayan (diskanstromme); Stemmestokker (gatta); Stemmehammer (gatta/hammer); Annet
sv: Tabla – inkluderade komponenter: Bärväska/fodral; Extra rem/snörning; Skinnvårdskit (pulver/pasta); Instruktionshäfte; Matchat par (bayan + dayan); Tillgång till onlinelektioner; Vadderade överdrag; Ringar (chutta); Enkel bayan (bastrumma); Enkel dayan (diskanttrumma); Stämklossar (gatta); Stämhammare (gatta/hammare); Annat
fi: Tablasettiin sisältyvät osat ja tarvikkeet: Kantokassi/kotelo; Ylimääräinen hihna/nauha; Kalvonhoitosarja (jauhe/tahna); Ohjekirja; Yhteensovitettu pari (bayan + dayan); Pääsy verkkotunneille; Pehmustetut suojat; Renkaat (chutta); Yksittäinen bayan (bassorumpu); Yksittäinen dayan (diskanttirumpu); Virityspalikat (gatta); Viritysvasara (gatta/vasara); Muu
ru: Комплектация таблы: Сумка/чехол для переноски; Дополнительный ремень/шнуровка; Набор для ухода за мембраной (пудра/паста); Брошюра с инструкцией; Подобранная пара (баян + даян); Доступ к онлайн-урокам; Мягкие чехлы; Кольца (чутта); Одиночный баян (басовый барабан); Одиночный даян (высокий барабан); Настроечные блоки (гатта); Настроечный молоток (гатта/молоток); Другое
pt-BR: Tabla componentes incluídos: Bolsa/estojo de transporte; Alça/laço extra; Kit de cuidado da pele (pó/pasta); Livreto de instruções; Par combinado (bayan + dayan); Acesso a aulas online; Capas acolchoadas; Anéis (chutta); Bayan individual (tambor baixo); Dayan individual (tambor agudo); Blocos de afinação (gatta); Martelo de afinação (gatta/martelo); Outro
sl-SI: Vključene komponente k tabli: Torba/kovček za prenašanje; Dodatni trak/vrvice; Komplet za nego opne (prah/pasta); Knjižica z navodili; Usklajen par (bayan + dayan); Dostop do spletnih lekcij; Podložene prevleke; Obroči (chutta); Enojni bayan (bas boben); Enojni dayan (visokotonski boben); Uglaševalni bloki (gatta); Kladivo za uglaševanje (gatta/kladivo); Drugo
hr-HR: Tabla uključene komponente: Torba/kovčeg za nošenje; Dodatni remen/vezica; Komplet za njegu opne (prah/pasta); Knjižica s uputama; Usklađeni par (bayan + dayan); Pristup online lekcijama; Podstavljene navlake; Prstenovi (chutta); Jednostruki bayan (bas bubanj); Jednostruki dayan (visokotonski bubanj); Blokovi za ugađanje (gatta); Čekić za ugađanje (gatta/čekić); Ostalo
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα Tabla: Τσάντα/Θήκη μεταφοράς; Επιπλέον ιμάντας/κορδόνι; Κιτ περιποίησης μεμβράνης (σκόνη/πάστα); Φυλλάδιο οδηγιών; Συνδυασμένο ζευγάρι (bayan + dayan); Πρόσβαση σε διαδικτυακά μαθήματα; Καλύμματα με επένδυση; Δακτύλιοι (chutta); Μονό bayan (μπάσο τύμπανο); Μονό dayan (πρίμο τύμπανο); Τάκοι κουρδίσματος (gatta); Σφυρί κουρδίσματος (gatta/σφυρί); Άλλο
zh-TW: 塔布拉鼓包含組件: 手提袋/收納箱; 備用綁帶/拉繩; 鼓面保養套組 (粉/膏); 說明手冊; 配對鼓組 (Bayan + Dayan); 線上課程存取權限; 加厚保護套; 底座墊圈 (Chutta); 單顆 Bayan (低音鼓); 單顆 Dayan (高音鼓); 調音木塊 (Gatta); 調音槌 (Gatta/調音槌); 其他
it: Componenti inclusi nella tabla: Borsa/custodia per il trasporto; Cinghia/allacciatura extra; Kit per la cura della pelle (polvere/pasta); Libretto di istruzioni; Coppia abbinata (bayan + dayan); Accesso alle lezioni online; Coperture imbottite; Anelli (chutta); Bayan singolo (tamburo basso); Dayan singolo (tamburo alto); Cunei per l'accordatura (gatta); Martelletto per l'accordatura (gatta/martello); Altro
hu: Tabla tartozékai: Hordtáska / tok; Pót heveder / fűző; Bőrápoló készlet (por / paszta); Használati útmutató; Összeillő pár (bayan + dayan); Online leckékhez hozzáférés; Párnázott huzatok; Gyűrűk (chutta); Szimpla bayan (basszusdob); Szimpla dayan (magasdob); Hangolóblokkok (gatta); Hangolókulcs / kalapács; Egyéb
lt-LT: Įtraukti tablos komponentas: Nešiojimo krepšys / dėklas; Papildomas dirželis / virvelė; Odos priežiūros rinkinys (milteliai / pasta); Instrukcijų knygelė; Suderinta pora („bayan“ + „dayan“); Prieiga prie internetinių pamokų; Paminkštinti uždangalai; Žiedai („chutta“); Vienas „bayan“ (bosinis būgnas); Vienas „dayan“ (aukštų dažnių būgnas); Derinimo kaladėlės („gatta“); Derinimo plaktukas; Kita
tr: Tabla dahil edilen bileşenler: Taşıma çantası/kutusu; Ekstra kayış/bağcık; Deri bakım kiti (toz/macun); Kullanım kitapçığı; Eşleştirilmiş takım (bayan + dayan); Çevrim içi derslere erişim; Dolgulu kılıflar; Halkalar (chutta); Tekli bayan (bas davulu); Tekli dayan (tiz davulu); Akort takozları (gatta); Akort çekici (gatta/çekiç); Diğer
cs: Komponenty bubnů tabla: Přepravní taška / pouzdro; Náhradní řemínek / šněrování; Sada pro péči o blánu (prášek/pasta); Návod k použití; Spárovaná sada (bajan a dajan); Přístup k online lekcím; Polstrované obaly; Podložky (chutta); Samostatný bajan (basový buben); Samostatný dajan (výškový buben); Ladicí válečky (gatta); Ladicí kladívko; Jiné
vi: Tabla bao gồm các thành phần: Túi/hộp đựng; Dây đeo/dây buộc bổ sung; Bộ chăm sóc mặt trống (bột/kem); Tập sách hướng dẫn; Cặp đồng bộ (bayan + dayan); Quyền truy cập bài học trực tuyến; Vỏ bọc có đệm lót; Vòng nệm (chutta); Trống bayan đơn (trống bass); Trống dayan đơn (trống treble); Khối chỉnh âm (gatta); Búa chỉnh âm (gatta/búa); Khác
th: ส่วนประกอบที่มาพร้อมกลองตะบลา: กระเป๋าพกพา/กล่องเก็บ; สายรัด/เชือกผูกเพิ่มเติม; ชุดดูแลหน้ากลอง (ผง/แป้งเปียก); คู่มือ; คู่ที่เข้ากัน (bayan + dayan); สิทธิ์เข้าถึงบทเรียนออนไลน์; ฝาครอบแบบบุนวม; วงแหวน (Chutta); บายันเดี่ยว (กลองเบส); ดายันเดี่ยว (กลองเสียงแหลม); บล็อกปรับเสียง (Gatta); ค้อนปรับเสียง (Gatta/ค้อน); อื่นๆ
ja: タブラ付属コンポーネント: キャリーバッグ/ケース; 予備ストラップ/ひも; ヘッドケアキット (パウダー/ペースト); 取扱説明書; マッチドペア (バヤン＋ダヤン); オンラインレッスンアクセス; パッド入りカバー; リング (チュッタ); シングルバヤン (低音ドラム); シングルダヤン (高音ドラム); チューニングブロック (ガッタ); チューニングハンマー (ガッタ/ハンマー); その他
zh-CN: 塔布拉鼓包含组件: 便携包/便携盒; 备用绑带/系带; 鼓面护理套装（粉末/糊剂）; 说明书; 配套对鼓（低音塔布拉鼓 + 高音塔布拉鼓）; 在线课程访问权限; 带垫护盖; 垫圈 (chutta); 单个低音塔布拉鼓（低音鼓）; 单个高音塔布拉鼓（高音鼓）; 调音木块 (gatta); 调音锤（gatta/调音锤）; 其他
en: Tabla included components: Carrying bag/case; Extra strap/lacing; Head care kit (powder/paste); Instruction booklet; Matched pair (bayan + dayan); Online lessons access; Padded covers; Rings (chutta); Single bayan (bass drum); Single dayan (treble drum); Tuning blocks (gatta); Tuning hammer (gatta/hammer); Other
de: Enthaltene Komponenten der Tabla: Tragetasche/-koffer; Zusätzlicher Gurt/Schnürung; Fellpflege-Set (Pulver/Paste); Anleitungsheft; Abgestimmtes Paar (Bayan + Dayan); Zugang zu Online-Lektionen; Gepolsterte Hüllen; Ringe (Chutta); Einzel-Bayan (Basstrommel); Einzel-Dayan (Diskanttrommel); Stimmblöcke (Gatta); Stimmhammer (Gatta/Hammer); Sonstige
nl: Tabla meegeleverde onderdelen: Draagtas/koffer; Extra riem/veters; Onderhoudsset vel (poeder/pasta); Instructieboekje; Bijpassend paar (bayan + dayan); Toegang tot onlinelessen; Gewatteerde hoezen; Ringen (chutta); Enkele bayan (basdrum); Enkele dayan (trebledrum); Stemblokken (gatta); Stemhamer (gatta/hamer); Overig
pl: Tabla zawiera komponenty: Torba/futerał; Dodatkowy pasek/rzemień; Zestaw do pielęgnacji membrany (proszek/pasta); Książeczka instruktażowa; Dopasowana para (bayan + dayan); Dostęp do lekcji online; Miękkie pokrowce; Podstawki (chutta); Pojedynczy bayan (bęben basowy); Pojedynczy dayan (bęben wiolinowy); Klocki do strojenia (gatta); Młotek do strojenia (gatta/młotek); Inne
sk-SK: Obsahuje jednotlivé časti dodávané so súpravou tably: Taška na prenášanie/puzdro; Náhradný popruh/šnúry; Súprava na ošetrenie blany (prášok/pasta); Inštruktážna knižka; Zladený pár (bajan + dajan); Prístup k online lekciám; Čalúnené kryty; Krúžky (čutty); Samostatný bajan (basový bubon); Samostatný dajan (výškový bubon); Ladiace kolíky (gatty); Ladiace kladivko; Iné
ro-RO: Componente care însoțesc tabla: Geantă/husă de transport; Curea/șnur suplimentar; Kit pentru îngrijirea membranei (pudră/pastă); Broșură cu instrucțiuni; Pereche asortată (bayan + dayan); Acces la lecții online; Huse căptușite; Inele (chutta); Bayan simplu (tobă bas); Dayan simplu (tobă înaltă); Blocuri de acordare (gatta); Ciocan de acordare (gatta/hammer); Altele
da: Medfølgende komponenter til tabla: Bæretaske/etui; Ekstra strop/snøring; Plejesæt til skind (pulver/pasta); Instruktionshæfte; Matchende par (bayan og dayan); Adgang til onlineundervisning; Polstrede overtræk; Ringe (chutta); Enkelt bayan (bastromme); Enkelt dayan (diskanttromme); Stemmeklodser (gatta); Stemmehammer (gatta/hammer); Andet
ko: 타블라 포함 구성품: 휴대용 가방/케이스; 추가 스트랩/끈; 헤드 관리 키트(가루/페이스트); 설명서; 매치 페어(바얀 + 다얀); 온라인 레슨 이용권; 패딩 커버; 링(추타); 싱글 바얀(베이스 드럼); 싱글 다얀(트레블 드럼); 튜닝 블록(가타); 튜닝 해머(가타/해머); 기타